Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-627] Salary ratings of entering or
reentering teachers; credit for military service. (a) Any teacher with
more than one year of teaching experience, and so accredited by the department,
entering or reentering the service of the department shall have the teacher's
salary rating determined by the personnel executive of the department, any
other law to the contrary notwithstanding, so that the salary rating shall be
equal to the salary ratings held by incumbent teachers in the department with
the identical number of years of experience.

(b) Any teacher who served on active duty with
the armed forces of the United States shall be given credit by the department
for the teacher's military service in the determination of the teacher's
salary, the teacher's eligibility for leaves of absence, and for all other
purposes of seniority. Both reentering and entering teachers shall have each
year of their military service or six months thereof credited as a year of
teaching experience; provided that no more than four years of credit for
military service shall be allowed. Evidence of military service shall be by
certificate. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next